Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.0197

Discrimination—Application of RCW 18.25.0192 through 18.25.0196.

RCW 18.25.0192 through 18.25.0196 shall apply to all agreements, renewals, or contracts issued on or after July 24, 1974.

[ 2000 c 171 s 7; 1974 ex.s. c 97 s 6. Formerly RCW 18.25.170.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 97: See note following RCW 18.25.0192.